Florida, session 2026, SB398.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 39.0138, Florida 16 Statutes, is amended to read: 17 39.0138âCriminal history and other records checks; limit on 18 placement of a child.â 19 (3)âThe department may not place a child with a person 20 other than a parent if the criminal history records check 21 reveals that the person has been convicted of any felony that 22 falls within any of the following categories: 23 (a)âChild abuse, abandonment, or neglect; 24 (b)âDomestic violence; 25 (c)âChild sexual abuse material pornography or other felony 26 in which a child was a victim of the offense; or 27 (d)âHomicide, sexual battery, or other felony involving 28 violence, other than felony assault or felony battery when an 29 adult was the victim of the assault or battery, or resisting 30 arrest with violence. 31 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 92.56, Florida 32 Statutes, is amended to read: 33 92.56âJudicial proceedings and court records involving 34 sexual offenses and human trafficking.â 35 (3)âThe state may use a pseudonym instead of the victimâs 36 name to designate the victim of a crime described in s. 37 787.06(3)(a)1., (c)1., or (e)1., in s. 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f), 38 or (g), or in chapter 794 or chapter 800, or of child abuse, 39 aggravated child abuse, or sexual performance by a child as 40 described in chapter 827, or any crime involving the production, 41 possession, or promotion of child sexual abuse material 42 pornography as described in chapter 847, in all court records 43 and records of court proceedings, both civil and criminal. 44 Section 3.âSection 92.561, Florida Statutes, is amended to 45 read: 46 92.561âProhibition on reproduction of child sexual abuse 47 material pornography.â 48 (1)âIn a criminal proceeding, any property or material that 49 portrays sexual performance by a child as defined in s. 827.071, 50 constitutes generated child sexual abuse material pornography as 51 defined in s. 827.072, or constitutes child sexual abuse 52 material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, must remain 53 secured or locked in the care, custody, and control of a law 54 enforcement agency, the state attorney, or the court. 55 (2)âNotwithstanding any law or rule of court, a court shall 56 deny, in a criminal proceeding, any request by the defendant to 57 copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any property 58 or material that portrays sexual performance by a child, 59 constitutes generated child sexual abuse material pornography, 60 or constitutes child sexual abuse material pornography so long 61 as the state attorney makes the property or material reasonably 62 available to the defendant. 63 (3)âFor purposes of this section, property or material is 64 deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if the state 65 attorney provides ample opportunity at a designated facility for 66 the inspection, viewing, and examination of the property or 67 material that portrays sexual performance by a child, 68 constitutes generated child sexual abuse material pornography, 69 or constitutes child sexual abuse material pornography by the 70 defendant, his or her attorney, or any individual whom the 71 defendant uses as an expert during the discovery process or at a 72 court proceeding. 73 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 74 435.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 75 435.07âExemptions from disqualification.âUnless otherwise 76 provided by law, the provisions of this section apply to 77 exemptions from disqualification for disqualifying offenses 78 revealed pursuant to background screenings required under this 79 chapter, regardless of whether those disqualifying offenses are 80 listed in this chapter or other laws. 81 (4) 82 (c)âDisqualification from employment under this chapter may 83 not be removed from, and an exemption may not be granted to, any 84 current or prospective child care personnel, as defined in s. 85 402.302(3), and such a person is disqualified from employment as 86 child care personnel, regardless of any previous exemptions from 87 disqualification, if the person has been registered as a sex 88 offender as described in 42 U.S.C. s. 9858f(c)(1)(C) or has been 89 arrested for and is awaiting final disposition of, has been 90 convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of guilty or 91 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, or has been 92 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or 93 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following 94 provisions of state law or a similar law of another 95 jurisdiction: 96 1.âA felony offense prohibited under any of the following 97 statutes: 98 a.âChapter 741, relating to domestic violence. 99 b.âSection 782.04, relating to murder. 100 c.âSection 782.07, relating to manslaughter; aggravated 101 manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled adult; aggravated 102 manslaughter of a child; or aggravated manslaughter of an 103 officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical technician, or a 104 paramedic. 105 d.âSection 784.021, relating to aggravated assault. 106 e.âSection 784.045, relating to aggravated battery. 107 f.âSection 787.01, relating to kidnapping. 108 g.âSection 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a child. 109 h.âSection 787.04(2), relating to leading, taking, 110 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or 111 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending 112 custody proceedings. 113 i.âSection 787.04(3), relating to leading, taking, 114 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or 115 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending 116 dependency proceedings or proceedings concerning alleged abuse 117 or neglect of a minor. 118 j.âSection 794.011, relating to sexual battery. 119 k.âFormer s. 794.041, relating to sexual activity with or 120 solicitation of a child by a person in familial or custodial 121 authority. 122 l.âSection 794.05, relating to unlawful sexual activity 123 with certain minors. 124 m.âSection 794.08, relating to female genital mutilation. 125 n.âSection 806.01, relating to arson. 126 o.âSection 826.04, relating to incest. 127 p.âSection 827.03, relating to child abuse, aggravated 128 child abuse, or neglect of a child. 129 q.âSection 827.04, relating to contributing to the 130 delinquency or dependency of a child. 131 r.âSection 827.071, relating to sexual performance by a 132 child. 133 s.âChapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material 134 pornography. 135 t.âChapter 893, relating to a drug abuse prevention and 136 control offense, if that offense was committed in the preceding 137 5 years. 138 u.âSection 985.701, relating to sexual misconduct in 139 juvenile justice programs. 140 2.âA misdemeanor offense prohibited under any of the 141 following statutes: 142 a.âSection 784.03, relating to battery, if the victim of 143 the offense was a minor. 144 b.âSection 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a child. 145 c.âChapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material 146 pornography. 147 3.âA criminal act committed in another state or under 148 federal law which, if committed in this state, constitutes an 149 offense prohibited under any statute listed in subparagraph 1. 150 or subparagraph 2. 151 Section 5.âParagraph (aa) of subsection (5) of section 152 456.074, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 153 456.074âCertain health care practitioners; immediate 154 suspension of license.â 155 (5)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 156 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is 157 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring 158 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of 159 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar 160 offenses in another jurisdiction: 161 (aa)âSection 847.0137, relating to the transmission of 162 child sexual abuse material pornography by electronic device or 163 equipment. 164 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsection 165 (2) of section 775.0847, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 166 775.0847âPossession or promotion of certain images of child 167 sexual abuse material pornography; reclassification.â 168 (1)âFor purposes of this section: 169 (b)ââChild sexual abuse material pornographyâ means: 170 1.âAny image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct; 171 or 172 2.âAny image that has been created, altered, adapted, or 173 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray 174 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct. 175 (2)âA violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137, or 176 s. 847.0138 shall be reclassified to the next higher degree as 177 provided in subsection (3) if: 178 (a)âThe offender possesses 10 or more images of any form of 179 child sexual abuse material pornography regardless of content; 180 and 181 (b)âThe content of at least one image contains one or more 182 of the following: 183 1.âA child who is younger than the age of 5. 184 2.âSadomasochistic abuse involving a child. 185 3.âSexual battery involving a child. 186 4.âSexual bestiality involving a child. 187 5.âAny motion picture, film, video, or computer-generated 188 motion picture, film, or video involving a child, regardless of 189 length and regardless of whether the motion picture, film, 190 video, or computer-generated motion picture, film, or video 191 contains sound. 192 193 For purposes of sentencing under chapter 921 and determining 194 incentive gain-time eligibility under chapter 944, a felony 195 offense that is reclassified under this section is ranked one 196 level above the ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 of the 197 offense committed. 198 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1), subsection (4), 199 and paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 827.071, Florida 200 Statutes, are amended to read: 201 827.071âSexual performance by a child; child sexual abuse 202 material pornography; penalties.â 203 (1)âAs used in this section, the following definitions 204 shall apply: 205 (b)ââChild sexual abuse material pornographyâ means: 206 1.âAny image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct; 207 or 208 2.âAny image that has been created, altered, adapted, or 209 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray 210 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct. 211 (4)âIt is unlawful for any person to possess with the 212 intent to promote any photograph, motion picture, exhibition, 213 show, representation, or other presentation which, in whole or 214 in part, includes child sexual abuse material pornography. The 215 possession of three or more copies of such photograph, motion 216 picture, representation, or presentation is prima facie evidence 217 of an intent to promote. A person who violates this subsection 218 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in 219 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 220 (5)(a)âIt is unlawful for any person to knowingly solicit, 221 possess, control, or intentionally view a photograph, motion 222 picture, exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer 223 depiction, or other presentation which, in whole or in part, he 224 or she knows to include child sexual abuse material pornography. 225 The solicitation, possession, control, or intentional viewing of 226 each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition, show, image, 227 data, computer depiction, representation, or presentation is a 228 separate offense. If such photograph, motion picture, 229 exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer 230 depiction, or other presentation includes child sexual abuse 231 material pornography depicting more than one child, then each 232 such child in each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition, 233 show, representation, image, data, computer depiction, or other 234 presentation that is knowingly solicited, possessed, controlled, 235 or intentionally viewed is a separate offense. A person who 236 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third degree, 237 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 238 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraphs 239 (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of section 827.072, Florida 240 Statutes, are amended to read: 241 827.072âGenerated child sexual abuse material pornography.â 242 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 243 (a)ââGenerated child sexual abuse material pornographyâ 244 means any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or 245 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other computer-generated 246 means to portray a fictitious person, who a reasonable person 247 would regard as being a real person younger than 18 years of 248 age, engaged in sexual conduct. 249 (2)(a)âIt is unlawful for a person to knowingly possess or 250 control or intentionally view a photograph, a motion picture, a 251 representation, an image, a data file, a computer depiction, or 252 any other presentation which, in whole or in part, he or she 253 knows includes generated child sexual abuse material 254 pornography. The possession, control, or intentional viewing of 255 each such photograph, motion picture, representation, image, 256 data file, computer depiction, or other presentation is a 257 separate offense. A person who violates this paragraph commits a 258 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 259 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 260 (b)âA person who intentionally creates generated child 261 sexual abuse material pornography commits a felony of the third 262 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 263 775.084. 264 Section 9.âSubsection (11) of section 836.13, Florida 265 Statutes, is amended to read: 266 836.13âAltered sexual depictions; prohibited acts; 267 penalties; applicability.â 268 (11)âProsecution of a person for an offense under this 269 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this 270 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including 271 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this 272 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse 273 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual 274 exploitation of children. 275 Section 10.âSubsection (9) of section 836.14, Florida 276 Statutes, is amended to read: 277 836.14âTheft or unauthorized promotion of a sexually 278 explicit image.â 279 (9)âProsecution of a person for an offense under this 280 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this 281 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including 282 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this 283 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse 284 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual 285 exploitation of children. 286 Section 11.âSubsection (3) of section 847.001, Florida 287 Statutes, is amended to read: 288 847.001âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 289 (3)ââChild sexual abuse material pornographyâ means: 290 (a)âAny image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct; 291 or 292 (b)âAny image that has been created, altered, adapted, or 293 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray 294 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct. 295 Section 12.âSection 847.002, Florida Statutes, is amended 296 to read: 297 847.002âChild sexual abuse material pornography 298 prosecutions.â 299 (1)âAny law enforcement officer who, pursuant to a criminal 300 investigation, recovers images or movies of child sexual abuse 301 material pornography shall: 302 (a)âProvide such images or movies to the law enforcement 303 agency representative assigned to the Child Victim 304 Identification Program at the National Center for Missing and 305 Exploited Children, as required by the centerâs guidelines. 306 (b)âRequest the law enforcement agency contact information 307 from the Child Victim Identification Program for any images or 308 movies recovered which contain an identified victim of child 309 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03. 310 (c)âProvide case information to the Child Victim 311 Identification Program, as required by the National Center for 312 Missing and Exploited Children guidelines, in any case where the 313 law enforcement officer identifies a previously unidentified 314 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography. 315 (2)âAny law enforcement officer submitting a case for 316 prosecution which involves the production, promotion, or 317 possession of child sexual abuse material pornography shall 318 submit to the designated prosecutor the law enforcement agency 319 contact information provided by the Child Victim Identification 320 Program at the National Center for Missing and Exploited 321 Children, for any images or movies involved in the case which 322 contain the depiction of an identified victim of child sexual 323 abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03. 324 (3)âIn every filed case involving an identified victim of 325 child sexual abuse material pornography, as defined in s. 326 960.03, the prosecuting agency shall enter the following 327 information into the Victims in Child Pornography Tracking 328 Repeat Exploitation database maintained by the Office of the 329 Attorney General: 330 (a)âThe case number and agency file number. 331 (b)âThe named defendant. 332 (c)âThe circuit court division and county. 333 (d)âCurrent court dates and the status of the case. 334 (e)âContact information for the prosecutor assigned. 335 (f)âVerification that the prosecutor is or is not in 336 possession of a victim impact statement and will use the 337 statement in sentencing. 338 Section 13.âSubsections (1) and (4) of section 847.01357, 339 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 340 847.01357âExploited childrenâs civil remedy.â 341 (1)âAny person who, while under the age of 18, was a victim 342 of a sexual abuse crime listed in chapter 794, chapter 800, 343 chapter 827, or chapter 847, where any portion of such abuse was 344 used in the production of child sexual abuse material 345 pornography, and who suffers personal or psychological injury as 346 a result of the production, promotion, or possession of such 347 images or movies, may bring an action in an appropriate state 348 court against the producer, promoter, or possessor of such 349 images or movies, regardless of whether the victim is now an 350 adult. In any action brought under this section, a prevailing 351 plaintiff shall recover the actual damages such person sustained 352 and the cost of the suit, including reasonable attorneyâs fees. 353 Any victim who is awarded damages under this section shall be 354 deemed to have sustained damages of at least $150,000. 355 (4)âIt is not a defense to a civil cause of action under 356 this section that the respondent did not know the victim or 357 commit the abuse depicted in any image of child sexual abuse 358 material pornography. 359 Section 14.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 360 847.0137, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 361 847.0137âTransmission of child sexual abuse material 362 pornography by electronic device or equipment prohibited; 363 penalties.â 364 (2)âNotwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person in 365 this state who knew or reasonably should have known that he or 366 she was transmitting child sexual abuse material pornography, as 367 defined in s. 847.001, to another person in this state or in 368 another jurisdiction commits a felony of the third degree, 369 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 370 (3)âNotwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person in 371 any jurisdiction other than this state who knew or reasonably 372 should have known that he or she was transmitting child sexual 373 abuse material pornography, as defined in s. 847.001, to any 374 person in this state commits a felony of the third degree, 375 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 376 (4)âThis section shall not be construed to preclude 377 prosecution of a person in this state or another jurisdiction 378 for a violation of any law of this state, including a law 379 providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this section, 380 for the transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, 381 as defined in s. 847.001, to any person in this state. 382 383 The provisions of this section do not apply to subscription 384 based transmissions such as list servers. 385 Section 15.âSection 847.0139, Florida Statutes, is amended 386 to read: 387 847.0139âImmunity from civil liability for reporting child 388 sexual abuse material pornography, transmission of child sexual 389 abuse material pornography, or any image, information, or data 390 harmful to minors to a minor in this state.âAny person who 391 reports to a law enforcement officer what the person reasonably 392 believes to be child sexual abuse material pornography, 393 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or any 394 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor 395 in this state may not be held civilly liable for such reporting. 396 For purposes of this section, such reporting may include 397 furnishing the law enforcement officer with any image, 398 information, or data that the person reasonably believes to be 399 evidence of child sexual abuse material pornography, 400 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or an 401 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor 402 in this state. 403 Section 16.âSubsection (6) of section 903.011, Florida 404 Statutes, is amended to read: 405 903.011âPretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform 406 bond schedule.â 407 (6)âA person may not be released before his or her first 408 appearance hearing or bail determination and a judge must 409 determine the appropriate bail, if any, based on an 410 individualized consideration of the criteria in s. 903.046(2), 411 if the person meets any of the following criteria: 412 (a)âThe person was, at the time of arrest for any felony, 413 on pretrial release, probation, or community control in this 414 state or any other state; 415 (b)âThe person was, at the time of arrest, designated as a 416 sexual offender or sexual predator in this state or any other 417 state; 418 (c)âThe person was arrested for violating a protective 419 injunction; 420 (d)âThe person was, at the time of arrest, on release from 421 supervision under s. 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.149, or s. 422 944.4731; 423 (e)âThe person has, at any time before the current arrest, 424 been sentenced pursuant to s. 775.082(9) or s. 775.084 as a 425 prison releasee reoffender, habitual violent felony offender, 426 three-time violent felony offender, or violent career criminal; 427 (f)âThe person has been arrested three or more times in the 428 6 months immediately preceding his or her arrest for the current 429 offense; or 430 (g)âThe personâs current offense of arrest is for one or 431 more of the following crimes: 432 1.âA capital felony, life felony, felony of the first 433 degree, or felony of the second degree; 434 2.âA homicide under chapter 782; or any attempt, 435 solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a homicide; 436 3.âAssault in furtherance of a riot or an aggravated riot; 437 felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation; domestic 438 violence, as defined in s. 741.28; stalking; mob intimidation; 439 assault or battery on a law enforcement officer; assault or 440 battery on juvenile probation officer, or other staff of a 441 detention center or commitment facility, or a staff member of a 442 commitment facility, or health services personnel; assault or 443 battery on a person 65 years of age or older; robbery; burglary; 444 carjacking; or resisting an officer with violence; 445 4.âKidnapping, false imprisonment, human trafficking, or 446 human smuggling; 447 5.âPossession of a firearm or ammunition by a felon, 448 violent career criminal, or person subject to an injunction 449 against committing acts of domestic violence, stalking, or 450 cyberstalking; 451 6.âSexual battery; indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching; 452 exposure of sexual organs; incest; luring or enticing a child; 453 or child sexual abuse material pornography; 454 7.âAbuse, neglect, or exploitation of an elderly person or 455 disabled adult; 456 8.âChild abuse or aggravated child abuse; 457 9.âArson; riot, aggravated riot, inciting a riot, or 458 aggravated inciting a riot; or a burglary or theft during a 459 riot; 460 10.âEscape; tampering or retaliating against a witness, 461 victim, or informant; destruction of evidence; or tampering with 462 a jury; 463 11.âAny offense committed for the purpose of benefiting, 464 promoting, or furthering the interests of a criminal gang; 465 12.âTrafficking in a controlled substance, including 466 conspiracy to engage in trafficking in a controlled substance; 467 13.âRacketeering; or 468 14.âFailure to appear at required court proceedings while 469 on bail. 470 Section 17.âParagraphs (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (3) 471 of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 472 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 473 chart.â 474 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 475 (e)âLEVEL 5 476 477 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 478 316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury, failure to stop; leaving scene. 479 316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 480 316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel; obtaining fuel fraudulently. 481 322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor vehicle with suspended license, resulting in death or serious bodily injury. 482 327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 483 365.172â(14)(b)2. 2nd Misuse of emergency communications system resulting in death. 484 379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to: willful molestation of stone crab traps, lines, or buoys; illegal bartering, trading, or sale, conspiring or aiding in such barter, trade, or sale, or supplying, agreeing to supply, aiding in supplying, or giving away stone crab trap tags or certificates; making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, or reproducing stone crab trap tags; possession of forged, counterfeit, or imitation stone crab trap tags; and engaging in the commercial harvest of stone crabs while license is suspended or revoked. 485 379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a commercial harvesterâs spiny lobster trap, line, or buoy. 486 379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more undersized spiny lobsters. 487 381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs knowing HIV positive. 488 440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workersâ compensation coverage. 489 440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the purpose of making workersâ compensation claims. 490 440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false, misleading, or incomplete information with the purpose of avoiding or reducing workersâ compensation premiums. 491 624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a certificate or authority; premium collected $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 492 626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized insurer; repeat offender. 493 790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a concealed firearm. 494 790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge destructive device. 495 790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, or use of firearms in violent manner. 496 790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled shotgun or machine gun. 497 790.23 2nd Felons in possession of firearms, ammunition, or electronic weapons or devices. 498 796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a prostitute; 1st offense. 499 800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender less than 18 years of age. 500 800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender 18 years of age or older. 501 806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or dispense fire bomb with intent to damage any structure or property. 502 810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism dissemination. 503 810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or subsequent offense. 504 810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims. 505 812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft from 20 or more dwellings or their unenclosed curtilage, or any combination. 506 812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $10,000 or more but less than $50,000. 507 812.015â(8)(a) & (c)-(e) 3rd Retail theft; property stolen is valued at $750 or more and one or more specified acts. 508 812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 509 812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons. 510 812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or trafficking in. 511 812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets. 512 812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching. 513 812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop. 514 817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value $20,000 to $50,000. 515 817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 516 817.2341(1),â(2)(a) & (3)(a) 3rd Filing false financial statements, making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity. 517 817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information; value of benefit, services received, payment avoided, or amount of injury or fraud, $5,000 or more or use of personal identification information of 10 or more persons. 518 817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 519 817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 520 825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition in the presence of an elderly person or disabled adult. 521 828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent to inflict intense pain, serious physical injury, or death. 522 836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes for financial gain a sexually explicit image of an identifiable person without consent. 523 839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency involving great bodily harm or death. 524 843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to person; resist arrest with violence. 525 847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender 18 years or older. 526 847.0137â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography by electronic device or equipment. 527 847.0138â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or equipment. 528 874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 529 874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 years of age to join a criminal gang. 530 893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 531 893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 532 893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of university. 533 893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 534 893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 535 893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 536 893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 537 (f)âLEVEL 6 538 539 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 540 316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash involving serious bodily injury. 541 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent conviction. 542 316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding. 543 327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 544 400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 545 499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statement. 546 499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of prescription drug from unauthorized person. 547 499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of prescription drug to unauthorized person. 548 775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law enforcement officer. 549 784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly weapon without intent to kill. 550 784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to commit felony. 551 784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation. 552 784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible threat. 553 784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person under 16. 554 784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law enforcement officer. 555 784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually violent predators facility staff. 556 784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person 65 years of age or older. 557 784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified official or employee. 558 784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 559 784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code inspector. 560 787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining with purpose other than those in s. 787.01. 561 787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child. 562 790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon on school property. 563 790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw destructive device with intent to do bodily harm or damage property. 564 790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, act of arson or violence to state property, or use of firearms in violent manner. 565 790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly missiles into dwellings, vessels, or vehicles. 566 794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to participate in sexual activity by custodial adult. 567 794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with specified minor. 568 800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but less than 16 years of age; offender less than 18 years. 569 800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender 18 years of age or older. 570 806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily harm to firefighter or any other person. 571 810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 572 810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims; 2nd or subsequent offense. 573 812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or more, but less than $100,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 574 812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree; firearm. 575 812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 576 812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen $750 or more; second or subsequent conviction. 577 812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated property stolen within 120 days is $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 578 812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 579 812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons and use of social media platform. 580 812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other weapon (strong-arm robbery). 581 817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia with intent to create cloned cellular telephones. 582 817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false report of a crime resulting in death. 583 817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more patients. 584 817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 585 825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult. 586 825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or disabled adult. 587 825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation of an elderly person or disabled adult. 588 825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at less than $10,000. 589 827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child. 590 827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child. 591 827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child sexual abuse material pornography. 592 828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving animals. 593 836.05 2nd Threats; extortion. 594 836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats to kill, do bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting or an act of terrorism. 595 843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to escape. 596 847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to distribute, or possessing with intent to distribute obscene materials depicting minors. 597 847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the production of materials harmful to minors. 598 847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of or with a minor or the visual depiction of such conduct. 599 893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled substances resulting in overdose or serious bodily injury. 600 914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, with bodily injury. 601 918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence relating to a capital felony. 602 944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery upon or inflicting cruel or inhuman treatment on an inmate or offender on community supervision, resulting in great bodily harm. 603 944.40 2nd Escapes. 604 944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding escaped prisoners. 605 944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband (firearm, weapon, or explosive) into correctional facility. 606 951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced into county detention facility. 607 (g)âLEVEL 7 608 609 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 610 316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death, failure to stop; leaving scene. 611 316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 612 316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury or death to another person; driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 613 327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 614 402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and negligence or intentional act resulting in great bodily harm, permanent disfiguration, permanent disability, or death. 615 409.920â(2)(b)1.a. 3rd Medicaid provider fraud; $10,000 or less. 616 409.920â(2)(b)1.b. 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more than $10,000, but less than $50,000. 617 456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care profession without a license. 618 456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care profession without a license which results in serious bodily injury. 619 458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a license. 620 459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine without a license. 621 460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic medicine without a license. 622 461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine without a license. 623 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without a license. 624 463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a license. 625 464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a license. 626 465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a license. 627 466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene without a license. 628 467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a license. 629 468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care services without a license. 630 483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical laboratory personnel without a license. 631 483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics without a license. 632 484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical devices without a prescription. 633 484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without a license. 634 494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of chapter 494 in which the total money and property unlawfully obtained exceeded $50,000 and there were five or more victims. 635 560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by a money services business. 636 560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 637 655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by financial institution. 638 775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to register; failure to renew driver license or identification card; other registration violations. 639 775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where children regularly congregate. 640 775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual predator; harbor or conceal a sexual predator. 641 782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a person by a person other than the perpetrator or the perpetrator of an attempted felony. 642 782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or culpable negligence of another (manslaughter). 643 782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or unborn child by the operation of a motor vehicle in a reckless manner (vehicular homicide). 644 782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the operation of a vessel in a reckless manner (vessel homicide). 645 784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery; intentionally causing great bodily harm or disfigurement. 646 784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using deadly weapon. 647 784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator aware victim pregnant. 648 784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of injunction or court order. 649 784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of court order. 650 784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law enforcement officer. 651 784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually violent predators facility staff. 652 784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 653 784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified official or employee. 654 784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 655 784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code inspector. 656 787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child; second or subsequent offense. 657 787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with a specified prior conviction. 658 787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an adult. 659 787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services by the transfer or transport of an adult from outside Florida to within the state. 660 790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation subsequent to previous conviction of s. 790.07(1) or (2). 661 790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun under specified circumstances. 662 790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or deliver hoax bomb. 663 790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use any hoax bomb while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 664 790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction. 665 790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 666 790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a person who qualifies for the penalty enhancements provided for in s. 874.04. 667 794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation; consent by a parent, guardian, or a person in custodial authority to a victim younger than 18 years of age. 668 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 2nd offense. 669 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 3rd and subsequent offense. 670 800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim younger than 12 years of age; offender younger than 18 years of age. 671 800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years of age; offender 18 years of age or older. 672 800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years; offender 18 years or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 673 806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by fire or explosive. 674 810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 675 810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 676 810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 677 810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized emergency vehicle. 678 812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at $100,000 or more or a semitrailer deployed by a law enforcement officer; property stolen while causing other property damage; 1st degree grand theft. 679 812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued at less than $50,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 680 812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency medical equipment; 2nd degree grand theft. 681 812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law enforcement equipment from authorized emergency vehicle. 682 812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree; firearm with previous conviction of s. 812.014(2)(c)5. 683 812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $50,000 or more. 684 812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates, organizes, plans, etc., the theft of property and traffics in stolen property. 685 812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching. 686 812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 687 817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value greater than $50,000. 688 817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle accident victims with intent to defraud. 689 817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or participating in an intentional motor vehicle collision. 690 817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value $100,000 or more. 691 817.2341â(2)(b) & (3)(b) 1st Making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity which are a significant cause of the insolvency of that entity. 692 817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud. 693 817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud. 694 817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document. 695 817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 696 825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or disabled adult causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 697 825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 698 827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 699 827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under 16 years of age by person 21 years of age or older. 700 827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a sexual performance, or promote or direct such performance. 701 827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child sexual abuse material pornography. 702 837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about alleged capital felony to a law enforcement officer. 703 838.015 2nd Bribery. 704 838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward for official behavior. 705 838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public servant. 706 838.22 2nd Bid tampering. 707 843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public officer or employee. 708 843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal process. 709 843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public officer or employee. 710 847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a computer service, to commit an unlawful sex act. 711 847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to commit an unlawful sex act. 712 872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body. 713 874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 714 874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises criminal gang-related activity. 715 893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 716 893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5., within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 717 893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 718 893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 25 lbs., less than 2,000 lbs. 719 893.135â(1)(b)1.a. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 28 grams, less than 200 grams. 720 893.135â(1)(c)1.a. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 4 grams, less than 14 grams. 721 893.135â(1)(c)2.a. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28 grams or more, less than 50 grams. 722 893.135â(1)(c)2.b. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 723 893.135â(1)(c)3.a. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 724 893.135â(1)(c)3.b. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14 grams or more, less than 25 grams. 725 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(I) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 726 893.135â(1)(d)1.a. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 727 893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 200 grams or more, less than 5 kilograms. 728 893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 729 893.135â(1)(g)1.a. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 730 893.135â(1)(h)1.a. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 731 893.135â(1)(j)1.a. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 732 893.135â(1)(k)2.a. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 10 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 733 893.135â(1)(m)2.a. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 280 grams or more, less than 500 grams. 734 893.135â(1)(m)2.b. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 500 grams or more, less than 1,000 grams. 735 893.135â(1)(n)2.a. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 14 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 736 893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 737 896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 738 896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 739 943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating permanent residence; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 740 943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in state after indicating intent to leave; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 741 943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 742 943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 743 943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 744 944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 745 944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 746 944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 747 944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 748 985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 749 985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 750 985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 751 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 752 948.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 753 948.06âViolation of probation or community control; 754 revocation; modification; continuance; failure to pay 755 restitution or cost of supervision.â 756 (8) 757 (c)âFor purposes of this section, the term âqualifying 758 offenseâ means any of the following: 759 1.âKidnapping or attempted kidnapping under s. 787.01, 760 false imprisonment of a child under the age of 13 under s. 761 787.02(3), or luring or enticing a child under s. 787.025(2)(b) 762 or (c). 763 2.âMurder or attempted murder under s. 782.04, attempted 764 felony murder under s. 782.051, or manslaughter under s. 782.07. 765 3.âAggravated battery or attempted aggravated battery under 766 s. 784.045. 767 4.âSexual battery or attempted sexual battery under s. 768 794.011(2), (3), (4), or (8)(b) or (c). 769 5.âLewd or lascivious battery or attempted lewd or 770 lascivious battery under s. 800.04(4), lewd or lascivious 771 molestation under s. 800.04(5)(b) or (c)2., lewd or lascivious 772 conduct under s. 800.04(6)(b), lewd or lascivious exhibition 773 under s. 800.04(7)(b), or lewd or lascivious exhibition on 774 computer under s. 847.0135(5)(b). 775 6.âRobbery or attempted robbery under s. 812.13, carjacking 776 or attempted carjacking under s. 812.133, or home invasion 777 robbery or attempted home invasion robbery under s. 812.135. 778 7.âLewd or lascivious offense upon or in the presence of an 779 elderly or disabled person or attempted lewd or lascivious 780 offense upon or in the presence of an elderly or disabled person 781 under s. 825.1025. 782 8.âSexual performance by a child or attempted sexual 783 performance by a child under s. 827.071. 784 9.âComputer pornography under s. 847.0135(2) or (3), 785 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography under s. 786 847.0137, or selling or buying of minors under s. 847.0145. 787 10.âPoisoning food or water under s. 859.01. 788 11.âAbuse of a dead human body under s. 872.06. 789 12.âAny burglary offense or attempted burglary offense that 790 is either a first degree felony or second degree felony under s. 791 810.02(2) or (3). 792 13.âArson or attempted arson under s. 806.01(1). 793 14.âAggravated assault under s. 784.021. 794 15.âAggravated stalking under s. 784.048(3), (4), (5), or 795 (7). 796 16.âAircraft piracy under s. 860.16. 797 17.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 798 destructive device or bomb under s. 790.161(2), (3), or (4). 799 18.âTreason under s. 876.32. 800 19.âAny offense committed in another jurisdiction which 801 would be an offense listed in this paragraph if that offense had 802 been committed in this state. 803 Section 19.âParagraph (e) of subsection (3) and subsection 804 (10) of section 960.03, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 805 960.03âDefinitions; ss. 960.01-960.28.âAs used in ss. 806 960.01-960.28, unless the context otherwise requires, the term: 807 (3)ââCrimeâ means: 808 (e)âA violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137, or 809 s. 847.0138, related to online sexual exploitation and child 810 sexual abuse material pornography. 811 (10)ââIdentified victim of child sexual abuse material 812 pornographyâ means any person who, while under the age of 18, is 813 depicted in any image or movie of child sexual abuse material 814 pornography and who is identified through a report generated by 815 a law enforcement agency and provided to the National Center for 816 Missing and Exploited Childrenâs Child Victim Identification 817 Program. 818 Section 20.âSubsection (1) of section 960.197, Florida 819 Statutes, is amended to read: 820 960.197âAssistance to victims of online sexual exploitation 821 and child sexual abuse material pornography.â 822 (1)âNotwithstanding the criteria set forth in s. 960.13 for 823 crime victim compensation awards, the department may award 824 compensation for counseling and other mental health services to 825 treat psychological injury or trauma to: 826 (a)âA child younger than 18 years of age who suffers 827 psychiatric or psychological injury as a direct result of online 828 sexual exploitation under any provision of s. 827.071, s. 829 847.0135, s. 847.0137, or s. 847.0138, and who does not 830 otherwise sustain a personal injury or death; or 831 (b)âAny person who, while younger than age 18, was depicted 832 in any image or movie, regardless of length, of child sexual 833 abuse material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, who has 834 been identified by a law enforcement agency or the National 835 Center for Missing and Exploited Children as an identified 836 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography, who suffers 837 psychiatric or psychological injury as a direct result of the 838 crime, and who does not otherwise sustain a personal injury or 839 death. 840 Section 21.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.